Georgia statutes. 
JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Commission from still destruction unauthorized. - The ordinary (now judge of the probate court) is without authority to appoint a police officer under an agreement by which the police officer is to be paid for work done in enforcing the prohibition law by destroying stills, and for which the police officer is to be paid so much for each still destroyed, to be paid out of the funds derived by fines and forfeitures from the enforcement of the prohibition law. If such work or service is rendered under a contract which the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) is not authorized to make, no implied obligation arises on the part of the county to pay for such services, even though the county receives the benefit. Eison v. Shirley, 165 Ga. 374, 141 S.E. 295 (1927).

Receipt of salary no bar to action for share of fees. - Fact that officer making seizure of an automobile engaged in the illegal transportation of intoxicating liquors received a salary does not preclude the officer from receiving the officer's part of fees provided by statute for officers responsible for confiscation of such automobiles. Cloud v. DeKalb County, 70 Ga. App. 777, 29 S.E.2d 441 (1944).

Cited in Levine v. Perry, 204 Ga. 323, 49 S.E.2d 820 (1948).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70 Am. Jur. 2d, Sheriffs, Police, and Constables, § 41 et seq.

36-8-5. Powers of county police generally.

Statute text

Under the direction and control of the county governing authority, the county police shall have:

(1) The same power to make arrests and to execute and return criminal warrants and processes in the county of their election or appointment only, as sheriffs have; and

(2) All the powers of sheriffs as peace officers in the county of their election or appointment.

History

(Ga. L. 1909, p. 156, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 851; Ga. L. 1914, p. 142, § 3; Code 1933, § 23-1403; Ga. L. 1961, p. 217, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Grant of power to Jekyll Island-State Park Authority not exclusive. - This section does not give Jekyll Island-State Park Authority exclusive police power, including law enforcement on Jekyll Island nor does the statute prohibit Glynn County police from exercising the powers granted the county officers by this section. Ferguson v. Leggett, 226 Ga. 333, 174 S.E.2d 913 (1970).

Duties and powers of deputy sheriff. - Office of sheriff carries with the office the duty to preserve the peace and protect the lives, persons, property, health, and morals of the people, and a deputy sheriff is an agent of the sheriff and in effecting the proper discharge of the deputy's duties is empowered with the same duties and powers. Veit v. State, 182 Ga. App. 753, 357 S.E.2d 113 (1987).

Warrantless arrest outside territorial limits. - Deputy sheriff had authority to make a warrantless arrest beyond the territorial limits of the deputy's own county. Watkins v. State, 207 Ga. App. 766, 430 S.E.2d 105 (1993), overruled on other grounds, West v. Waters, 272 Ga. 591, 533 S.E.2d 88 (2000).

Effect on powers of sheriff. - Even when a county police force is established, the power and authority of the sheriff to enforce the law and preserve the peace is not legally diminished. Wolfe v. Huff, 232 Ga. 44, 205 S.E.2d 254 (1974).

Fact that officers are outside jurisdiction does not make officers private citizens. - Fact that state officers making a warrantless search were, at the time of the search, outside of the officers' state-granted jurisdiction does not make such officers, thereby, merely private citizens so as to enable the federal government to freely use anything that was discovered by the state officers as evidence in a federal prosecution which would otherwise have been inadmissible. United States v. Hogue, 283 F. Supp. 846 (N.D. Ga. 1968).

Cited in Stone v. National Sur. Corp., 57 Ga. App. 427, 195 S.E. 905 (1938); McCarty v. State, 152 Ga. App. 726, 263 S.E.2d 700 (1979).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Powers of arrest. - Arresting powers of county police are confined to the county of appointment or election. 1960-61 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 62.

Power to arrest on state property. - Within the limits of their respective territorial or statutory jurisdiction, local law enforcement authorities may arrest offenders upon state property for violations of state laws, including property under the jurisdiction of the Georgia Building Authority Police. 1992 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 92-6.

Power to return prisoner from outside county. - County police under former Code 1933, § 23-1403 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-8-5) were authorized to go from the county of appointment to another county within the limits of the state to receive a prisoner who was under arrest and detention and return such prisoner to the county of appointment, according to former Code 1933, § 27-209 (see now O.C.G.A. § 17-4-25). 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 73.

Misdemeanor cases. - County police officer has the same authority as the sheriff in those cases once the defendant is arrested under a warrant charging a misdemeanor, so long as the prisoner is in the police officer's custody; if the county police officer turns the prisoner over to the sheriff without bail, it would thereafter be the responsibility of the sheriff to accept bail. 1962 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 63.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70 Am. Jur. 2d, Sheriffs, Police, and Constables, § 31 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 196, 207.

ALR. - Degree of force that may be employed in arresting one charged with a misdemeanor, 42 A.L.R. 1200.

36-8-6. Inspection of and reports on roads and bridges.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 529, § 1/HB 557, effective May 1, 2005.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1909, p. 156, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 852; Ga. L. 1914, p. 142, § 4; Code 1933, § 23-1404.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective July 1, 2012.

36-8-7. Rules and regulations for conduct, management, and control of county police.

Statute text

Upon the election or appointment of county police, the county governing authority shall make rules and regulations for the conduct, management, and control of such county police and shall, from time to time, enlarge, modify, or change such rules and regulations as its discretion may dictate.

History

(Ga. L. 1909, p. 156, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 853; Ga. L. 1914, p. 142, § 5; Code 1933, § 23-1405.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Levine v. Perry, 204 Ga. 323, 49 S.E.2d 820 (1948); Wolfe v. Huff, 232 Ga. 44, 205 S.E.2d 254 (1974).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Sexual misconduct or irregularity as amounting to "conduct unbecoming an officer," justifying officer's demotion or removal or suspension from duty, 9 A.L.R.4th 614.

——————————

CHAPTER 9

COUNTY PROPERTY GENERALLY

Sec.

36-9-1. Vesting in county of title under conveyances for use of county.

36-9-2. Control and disposal of county property generally.

36-9-2.1. Demolition of certain county courthouses.

36-9-3. Sale or disposition of county real property generally; right of certain counties to make private sale; right of county to negotiate and consummate private sales of recreational set-asides.

36-9-4. Maintenance of insurance on books of laws and court reports.

36-9-5. Erection, repair, and furnishing of county buildings; storage of county documents.

36-9-6. Courthouse rooms to be used by county officers.

36-9-7. Furnishing of supplies for county offices.

36-9-8. Protection of county property by sheriff.

36-9-9. Construction of county jails.

36-9-10. Inspection of county buildings, property, and records by grand jury [Repealed].

36-9-11. Destruction or damaging of any county building or its appurtenances or furniture.

Annotations

Cross references. - Exercise of power of eminent domain by counties for purposes of construction and operation of watershed projects, flood-control projects, and other projects, § 22-3-100 et seq.

36-9-1. Vesting in county of title under conveyances for use of county.

Statute text

All deeds, conveyances, grants, or other instruments which have been or may be made to any officer or person for the use and benefit of any county shall vest in the county the title as fully as if made to the county by name.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 466; Code 1868, § 528; Code 1873, § 494; Code 1882, § 494; Civil Code 1895, § 347; Civil Code 1910, § 395; Code 1933, § 91-601.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Titling of automobiles. - Trial court properly granted summary judgment to the board of county commissioners after a wrongful death action was filed against the county arising out of a collision involving the ambulance the employee was driving on an emergency call and the decedent's vehicle; even if the ambulance was titled in the name of the board of county commissioners, the law regarded the ambulance as being titled in the name of the county and the county, not the board of county commissioners, was the proper defendant when liability was based on respondeat superior. Smith v. Bulloch County Bd. of Comm'rs, 261 Ga. App. 667, 583 S.E.2d 475 (2003).

Cited in McElmurray v. Richmond County, 223 Ga. 47, 153 S.E.2d 427 (1967).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Property of county boards of education. - Former Code 1933, §§ 91-601 and 91-102 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-9-1 and 50-16-1 et seq.) were not applicable to property belonging to county boards of education. 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 107.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 470.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 219.

36-9-2. Control and disposal of county property generally.

Statute text

The county governing authority shall have the control of all property belonging to the county and may, by order entered on its minutes, direct the disposal of any real property which may lawfully be disposed of and make and execute good and sufficient title thereof on behalf of the county.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 467; Code 1868, § 529; Code 1873, § 495; Code 1882, § 495; Civil Code 1895, § 348; Civil Code 1910, § 396; Code 1933, § 91-602; Ga. L. 1935, p. 110, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

No disposal without legislative authority. - As a general proposition of law a county cannot, without legislative authority, dispose of real estate owned by the county. Head v. Lee, 203 Ga. 191, 45 S.E.2d 666 (1947).

Power not necessarily exclusive. - This section does not vest in the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) exclusive power of sale of the county's property when the General Assembly confers such powers upon county commissioners of a particular county. Dyer v. Martin, 132 Ga. 445, 64 S.E. 475 (1909) (decided prior to revision of section by Ga. L. 1935, p. 110, § 1.)

Authority for sale. - Proper resolution, duly recorded, is the authority by which the county's title for land may be divested by deed. Head v. Lee, 203 Ga. 191, 45 S.E.2d 666 (1947).

In the absence of a recorded order authorizing the conveyance in question, or subsequent ratification of the deed, the purported conveyance by the county did not pass the county's title for the land therein described. Head v. Lee, 203 Ga. 191, 45 S.E.2d 666 (1947).

Failure to comply with O.C.G.A. § 36-9-2 not a bar to bona fide purchaser's title. - Although a county failed to comply with O.C.G.A. § 36-9-2 by recording a transfer in the minutes when the county conveyed the county's interest in property, which the county had formerly acquired by eminent domain, to the county development authority, a subsequent purchaser was a bona fide purchaser without notice of this irregularity under O.C.G.A. § 23-1-20, so that the county's title was superior to that of the condemnee's heirs, who sought to repurchase the property under O.C.G.A. § 36-9-3(g)(3)(B). Darling Int'l, Inc. v. Carter, 294 Ga. 455, 754 S.E.2d 347 (2014).

When order not on minutes. - When county commissioners authorize a conveyance of land brought in by the county at a tax sale, but fail to put the order of authorization on the minutes, as required by this section, it is competent for the commissioners at a subsequent meeting of the board to ratify the deed to the purchaser from the county, and to cause the authorization to be put on the minutes. Braswell v. Palmer, 191 Ga. 262, 11 S.E.2d 889 (1940).

Tax sale not authorized. - Fact that a purported sale of county-owned property was by tax sale did not operate to negate or otherwise nullify the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-9-2. West v. Fulton County, 267 Ga. 456, 479 S.E.2d 722 (1997).

County commissioner is a public officer occupying a fiduciary relationship requiring the commissioner to exercise the utmost good faith, fidelity, and integrity in dealing with county property as a trustee and servant of the people, which the commissioner may not sell without legislative sanction unless the property's use shall have been abandoned by or become unserviceable to the county. If county property be sold by the commissioner, the commissioner shall obtain the most advantageous price. Timbs v. Straub, 216 Ga. 451, 117 S.E.2d 462 (1960).

County property which has become unserviceable may be sold by order of the county commissioners at private sale. Malcom v. Fulton County, 209 Ga. 392, 73 S.E.2d 173 (1952).

Property becomes unserviceable, within the meaning of this section, when the property cannot be beneficially or advantageously used under all circumstances for county purposes. Malcom v. Fulton County, 209 Ga. 392, 73 S.E.2d 173 (1952).

Denial or change of use of property. - County board of commissioners has right to deny use of any public property if the property is used in a wasteful or ineffective manner. Wheeler v. DeKalb County, 249 Ga. 678, 292 S.E.2d 855 (1982).

When public property is a building constructed from funds of a designated bond issue for a particular use, the board of commissioners may change the intended use of the building when circumstances which gave rise to the bond issue change so that the building constructed from those funds is no longer needed for that purpose, and the property's continued use for that purpose would be a waste of county resources. Wheeler v. DeKalb County, 249 Ga. 678, 292 S.E.2d 855 (1982).

Sheriff had power to modify county-owned property within exclusive use. - County sheriff had the independent authority to repaint and remark county-owned sheriff's vehicles assigned to the sheriff's exclusive use, but lacked the authority to modify portions of a county-owned building in which the sheriff's office and jail were housed, as the facility was shared with the superior, state, and magistrate courts of Clayton County, as well as the clerks of those courts, the solicitor general, and the district attorney, and hence, not under the sheriff's exclusive use. As a result, subject to compliance with O.C.G.A. § 40-8-91, summary judgment in favor of the county as to the extent of the sheriff's authority was reversed as to the former, but affirmed as to the latter. Hill v. Clayton County Bd. of Comm'rs, 283 Ga. App. 15, 640 S.E.2d 638 (2006), overruled on other grounds, Mayor & Aldermen of Savannah v. Batson-Cook Co., 291 Ga. 114, 728 S.E.2d 189 (Ga. 2012).

Sale of undivided interest. - This section does not warrant the sale of an undivided one-fifth of a courthouse and lot in actual daily use for county purposes. Hunnicutt v. City of Atlanta, 104 Ga. 1, 30 S.E. 500 (1898) (decided prior to revision of section by Ga. L. 1935, p. 110, § 1.)

Lease for ninety-nine years. - Commissioners cannot lease county property in such manner as to put the property out of the power of the county authorities for 99 years to devote the property to the exclusive use of the county. Equity will enjoin use under such a lease. Town of Decatur v. DeKalb County, 130 Ga. 483, 61 S.E. 23 (1908) (decided prior to revision of section by Ga. L. 1935, p. 110, § 1).

Applicability to lease. - When a lease of county property ran on a month-to-month basis, giving the lessee only a usufruct with no estate passing out of the county, this section was inapplicable since there was no conveyance of county property. Overlin v. Boyd, 598 F.2d 423 (5th Cir. 1979).

Nature of duty. - When a local law gives a board of commissioners exclusive jurisdiction in governing and controlling county property, the commissioners have the duty to maintain control over county property, but this duty coexists with the duty to exercise that control in the manner the commissioners deem most beneficial to the county. Smith v. Board of Comm'rs, 244 Ga. 133, 259 S.E.2d 74 (1979).

Usufruct of airport. - Contract by a county granting a usufruct of an airport to a private corporation for a period of years is not a disposition of county property requiring the antecedent resolution of county authorities. Southern Airways Co. v. DeKalb County, 102 Ga. App. 850, 118 S.E.2d 234 (1960).

Power of commissioners. - Those county officers who by virtue of their office have charge of the county affairs may, by proper order to be entered on their minutes, direct the disposal of and execute good and sufficient title to lands belonging to the county which are not necessary for public use. Head v. Lee, 203 Ga. 191, 45 S.E.2d 666 (1947).

Ordinary (now judge of the probate court) had power to lease directly to an individual certain realty for use in operating a filling station as it was then being and had been used for 13 years. Such a lease, having been so executed by the ordinary (now county governing authority) was not void on the ground that the lease was not authorized by law, or that the interest thereby created extended beyond the term of the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) then in office, or that the lease amounted to a commercial transaction in which the county was not authorized by law to engage. Black v. Forsyth County, 193 Ga. 571, 19 S.E.2d 297 (1942).

Signature on deed. - If the county commissioners authorize the sale of county land, the deed may lawfully be signed by the chair in the name of the board. Braswell v. Palmer, 191 Ga. 262, 11 S.E.2d 889 (1940).

Statute of limitation. - As the object of O.C.G.A. § 36-9-2 is to give information to the public, the statute of limitation in O.C.G.A. § 9-3-22 was inapplicable because the action arose from a claim that a public officer had failed to perform the officer's official duty. Dade County v. Miami Land Co., 253 Ga. 776, 325 S.E.2d 750 (1985).

Cited in Atlanta Title & Trust Co. v. Tidwell, 173 Ga. 499, 160 S.E. 620 (1931); Turner v. Johnston, 183 Ga. 176, 187 S.E. 864 (1936); Mayor of Fort Valley v. Levin, 183 Ga. 837, 190 S.E. 14 (1937); McDonald v. Marshall, 185 Ga. 438, 195 S.E. 571 (1938); Clayton v. Taylor, 223 Ga. 346, 155 S.E.2d 387 (1967); Shoemaker v. Department of Transp., 240 Ga. 573, 241 S.E.2d 820 (1978); Building Auth. v. State, 253 Ga. 242, 321 S.E.2d 97 (1984).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Ability of county commissioners to lease county property. - See 1977 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U77-3.

Permit to build sewer across street. - County commissioners may grant to a private corporation a permit to construct a sewer across a street dedicated to the county. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-36.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 485 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 223 et seq.

36-9-2.1. Demolition of certain county courthouses.

Statute text

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 36-9-2, a county governing authority shall not have the authority to demolish or to provide for the demolition of a county courthouse which was constructed prior to January 1, 1905, and which is listed in the National Register of Historic Places unless the question of whether or not to demolish the courthouse is submitted to the qualified voters of the county for approval or rejection in a referendum called for such purpose.

(b) The ballot in the referendum required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall have written or printed thereon the words:

"( ) YES Shall the demolition of the (Name of County) courthouse, as proposed by the governing authority of (Name of County), be approved?"

( ) NO

(c) A referendum held pursuant to this Code section shall be conducted only in conjunction with a general primary or general election and shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 21, the "Georgia Election Code."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-9-2.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 133, § 1.)

36-9-3. Sale or disposition of county real property generally; right of certain counties to make private sale; right of county to negotiate and consummate private sales of recreational set-asides.

Statute text

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the governing authority of any county disposing of any real property of such county shall make all such sales to the highest responsible bidder, either by sealed bids or by auction after due notice has been given. Any such county shall have the right to reject any and all bids or cancel any proposed sale. The governing authority of the county shall cause notice to be published once in the official legal organ of the county or in a newspaper of general circulation in the community, not less than 15 days nor more than 60 days preceding the day of the auction or, if the sale is by sealed bids, preceding the last day for the receipt of proposals. The legal notice shall include a legal description of the property to be sold. If the sale is by sealed bids, the notice shall also contain an invitation for proposals and shall state the conditions of the proposed sale, the address at which bid blanks and other written materials connected with the proposed sale may be obtained, and the date, time, and place for the opening of bids. If the sale is by auction, the notice shall also contain the conditions of the proposed sale and shall state the date, time, and place of the proposed sale. Bids received in connection with a sale by sealed bidding shall be opened in public at the time and place stated in the legal notice. A tabulation of all bids received shall be available for public inspection following the opening of all bids. All such bids shall be retained and kept available for public inspection for a period of not less than 60 days from the date on which such bids are opened.

(2) (A) Counties may retain the services of a Georgia licensed real estate broker to assist in the disposition of surplus real property; said brokerage services shall be procured by request for proposals in response to an issued solicitation. The proposal shall include the minimum stated broker qualifications and experience.

(B) In the event a county does retain the services of a qualified and experienced Georgia licensed real estate broker to assist in the disposition of surplus real property, the broker so retained shall:

(i) Represent the county and comply with the requirements of this Code section, including, but not limited to, issuing a call or request for sealed bids from the public and causing notice to be published once in the official legal organ of the county not less than 15 days nor more than 60 days preceding the day of the auction or, if the sale is by sealed bids, preceding the last day for the receipt of proposals. The legal notice shall include a legal description of the real property to be sold. The notice shall also contain a request for proposals and shall state the conditions of the proposed sale, the address at which bid blanks and other written materials connected with the proposed sale may be obtained, and the date, time, and place for the opening of bids;

(ii) Actively market the disposition of the real property;

(iii) Comply with all federal, state, and local laws;

(iv) Create a website which posts: the request for sealed bids; questions submitted by interested parties; responses to submitted questions as prepared by the county; dates the real property will be made available for public inspection; public information regarding the property; and other related communication and marketing information;

(v) Immediately forward the sealed bids to the governing authority of the county, which shall open such bids at the specified date, time, and place;

(vi) Only serve in the capacity of a broker engaged by a seller as provided for in Code Section 10-6A-5. A real estate broker representing a county shall be prohibited from working with or aiding a prospective buyer in connection with the disposition of real property for which the real estate broker was contracted; and

(vii) Agree to accept the agreed upon sales commission based on the highest responsive bid received as so adjudicated by the governing authority of the county, in its sole discretion.

(C) In the event the county decides to reject all bids and not award the sale to any of the bidders, the broker shall agree to accept the minimum payment in lieu of the commission as so agreed upon by the parties in an engagement contract.

(3) This subsection shall not apply to:

(A) Redemption of property held by any county under a tax deed; the granting of easements and rights of way; the sale, conveyance, or transfer of road rights of way; the sale, transfer, or conveyance to any other body politic; and any sale, transfer, or conveyance to a nonprofit corporation in order to effectuate a lease-purchase transaction pursuant to Code Section 36-60-13;

(B) Any option to sell or dispose of any real property belonging to any county of this state if that option was granted by said county prior to March 17, 1959;

(C) The sale of any real property belonging to any county in this state where the proper governing authority of the county advertised the property for ten consecutive days in the newspaper in which the sheriff's advertisements for the county are published, and where the sale was awarded thereafter to the highest and best bidder, in accordance with the terms of the advertisement, and an option given in accordance with the sale for the purchaser who had deposited a part of the purchase price to pay the balance within 365 days from the date of the execution of the option, where the sale was awarded and the option granted prior to May 1, 1961; or

(D) The exchange of real property belonging to any county in this state for other real property where the property so acquired by exchange shall be of equal or greater value than the property previously belonging to the county; provided, however, that within six weeks preceding the closing of any such proposed exchange of real property, a notice of the proposed exchange of real property shall be published in the official organ of the county once a week for four weeks. The value of both the property belonging to the county and that to be acquired through the exchange shall be determined by appraisals and the value so determined shall be approved by the proper authorities of said county.

(b) In any county of the state having a population of 550,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census, where the governing authority thereof has established or constituted an advisory commission, board, or authority to study and make recommendations for the future development, use, and sale of county owned property, the governing authority of such county shall have the right, with the advice and approval of such commission, board, or authority, to negotiate and consummate a private sale of any county owned property, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section. Where there is no commission, board, or authority established in such county for the particular class or type of property, the governing authority of such county shall nevertheless have the right to negotiate a private sale of any county owned property with the advice and approval of the grand jury.

(c) (1) Any county governing authority and the governing authority of any consolidated government may sell, grant, lease, rent, convey, or transfer any real property owned by the county or consolidated government, including real property dedicated or used as a park or recreation area, to the local board of education or other public educational institution for use as a site for a public school or other educational purpose. Any county governing authority and the governing authority of any consolidated government may sell, grant, convey, or transfer to the local board of education or other public educational institution licenses, easements, or lesser interests in such real property owned by the county or the consolidated government, including real property dedicated or used as a park or recreation area for such purposes. A county governing authority and the governing authority of any consolidated government are authorized to exchange real property, including real property dedicated or used as a park or recreation area, with the local board of education or other public educational institution for other real property for such purposes. Such a sale, grant, lease, rental, conveyance, or transfer may be made by negotiation between the governing authority and local board of education or other public educational institution without advertisement, bidding, auction, notice, publication, or referendum. This subsection shall not be construed to abrogate or impair any reverter provision or other condition of a sale, grant, conveyance, or transfer of real property to a county governing authority or governing authority of a consolidated government.

(2) Prior to executing any sale, grant, lease, rental, conveyance, or transfer pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the governing authority proposing such action shall hold a public hearing in the immediate vicinity of the affected property. Such hearing shall be advertised by posting conspicuous notice at the place of the hearing and at the affected property. The governing authority shall have at least one representative at the public hearing to receive the comments and concerns expressed and to report such comments and concerns to the governing authority.

(3) After the public hearing provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection but before the action proposed under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the governing authority proposing the action shall hold at least one meeting to discuss the transaction in light of the comments and concerns expressed at the public hearing.

(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, where the governing authority has, prior to March 1, 1987, approved and recommended the sale or disposal of county owned real property containing an area of less than 20,000 square feet, the governing authority shall have the right to negotiate and consummate a private sale of such property, provided such sale is for at least the fair market value of the property. Notice of the intention of the county governing authority to make a private sale shall be published once a week for four weeks in the official organ of the county.

(e) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, where the governing authority has prescribed a system of recreational set-asides where developers are required to set aside a certain amount of property in each new subdivision for recreational purposes and where those recreational set-asides have been conveyed to the county governing authority at no cost to the county, the county governing authority shall have the right to negotiate and consummate a private sale of such property to a homeowners' association representing the majority of property owners in the subdivision where the recreational set-aside property is located, provided that the use of the property shall be for recreational purposes for a period of not less than five years from the date of the sale. Notice of intention of the county governing authority to make a private sale shall be published once a week for four weeks in the official organ of the county.

(f) Notwithstanding any provision of this Code section to the contrary or any other provision of law or ordinance to the contrary, whenever any county determines that the establishment of a facility of the state or one of its authorities or other instrumentalities would be of benefit to the county, by way of providing activities in an area in need of redevelopment, by continuing or enhancing local employment opportunities, or by other means or in other ways, such county may sell or grant any of its real or personal property to the state or to any of its authorities or instrumentalities and, further, may sell or grant such lesser interests, rental agreements, licenses, easements, and other dispositions as it may determine necessary or convenient. These powers shall be cumulative of other powers and shall not be deemed to limit their exercise in any way.

(g) (1) As used in this subsection, the term "lake" means an impoundment of water in which at least 1,000 acres of land were to be submerged.

(2) Notwithstanding any provision of this Code section or any other law to the contrary, whenever any county has acquired property for the creation or development of a lake, including but not limited to property the acquisition of which was reasonably necessary or incidental to the creation or development of that lake, and the governing authority of such county thereafter determines that all of the property is no longer needed because of a decision by the county to not construct the lake, that county is authorized to dispose of such property or interest therein as provided in this subsection.

(3) (A) In disposing of property, as authorized under this subsection, the county shall notify the owner of such property at the time of its acquisition or, if the tract from which the county acquired its property has been subsequently sold, shall notify the owner of abutting land holding title through the owner from whom the county acquired its property. Any notice required pursuant to this subparagraph shall be in writing and delivered to the appropriate owner or by publication if such owner's address is unknown. Such owner shall have the right to acquire such property, as provided in this subsection.

(B) If the original owner of the property at the time of the county's acquisition of such property is deceased, the original owner's spouse, child, or grandchild shall have the first opportunity to purchase the property which the county is disposing of pursuant to this subsection; provided, however, the owner's child shall have such right only if the owner's spouse is deceased or has waived his or her right to purchase the property, and the owner's grandchild shall have such right only if both the owner's spouse and child either are deceased or have waived their right to buy the property. If the original owner's spouse is deceased and the original owner had more than one child or grandchild and such children or grandchildren have a right to purchase the property pursuant to this paragraph, then such children or grandchildren shall be entitled to purchase the property as tenants in common. The county shall place a notice of a sale proposed pursuant to this subparagraph once in the county legal organ. If after 45 days from the date of such publication the original owner's spouse, child, or grandchild has not come forward, or if the tract from which the county acquired its property has been subsequently sold, the county shall notify the owner of abutting land holding title through the owner from whom the county acquired its property as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. Publication pursuant to this subparagraph, if necessary, shall be in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property is located.

(4) When an entire parcel acquired by the county or any interest therein is being disposed of, it may be acquired under the right created in paragraph (3) of this subsection at such price as may be agreed upon, but in no event less than the price paid for its acquisition. When only remnants or portions of the original acquisition are being disposed of, they may be acquired for the market value thereof at the time the county decides the property is no longer needed.

(5) If the right of acquisition is not exercised within 60 days after due notice, the county shall proceed to sell such property as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section. The county shall thereupon have the right to reject any and all bids, in its discretion, to readvertise, or to abandon the sale.

(h) Notwithstanding any provision of this Code section or of any other law, ordinance, or resolution to the contrary, a county governing authority is authorized to sell and convey parcels of small or narrow strips of land, so shaped or so small as to be incapable of being used independently as zoned or under applicable subdivision or other development ordinances or land use plans, or as streets, whether owned in fee or used by easement, to abutting property owners where such sales and conveyances facilitate the enjoyment of the highest and best use of the abutting owner's property without first submitting the sale or conveyance to the process of an auction or the solicitation of sealed bids; provided, however, that each abutting property owner shall be notified of the availability of the property and shall have the opportunity to purchase said property under such terms and conditions as set out by ordinance.

(i) (1) As used in this subsection, the terms "conservation easement" and "holder" shall have the meanings as set forth in Code Section 44-10-2.

(2) Notwithstanding any provision of this Code section or of any other law, ordinance, or resolution to the contrary, whenever the governing authority of any county determines that the establishment of a conservation easement would be of benefit to the county and to its citizens by way of retaining or protecting natural, scenic, or open-space values of real property; assuring the availability of the property for agricultural, forest, recreational, or open-space use; protecting natural resources; maintaining or enhancing air or water quality; or preserving the historical, architectural, archeological, or cultural aspects of the property, such governing authority may sell or grant to any holder a conservation easement over any of its real property, including but not limited to any of its real property set aside for use as a park. These powers shall be cumulative of other powers and shall not be deemed to limit their exercise in any way; provided, however, that a conservation easement shall not be created, granted, or otherwise conveyed for the purpose of preventing, frustrating, or interfering with the exercise of the power of eminent domain by any public utility or other entity authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain.

History

(Code 1933, § 91-804.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1959, p. 325, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1124, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 195, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 65, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 239, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 678, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 560, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 539, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 33; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1100, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 676, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 877, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1348, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1352, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 237, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1036, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 746, § 1/HB 703; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1078, § 1/SB 390; Ga. L. 2018, p. 255, § 1/SB 397.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added paragraph (a)(2); and redesignated former paragraph (a)(2) as present paragraph (a)(3).

Cross references. - Disposition of property no longer needed for public road purposes, see T. 32, C. 7.
